Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB369.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217.930 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 217.930 to 217.942:
(1) "Eligible patient" means a veteran who meets the requirements of KRS 217.934;
(2) "Health care provider" means a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, or a licensed
physician assistant;
(3) "Health facility" has the same meaning as in KRS 216B.015;
(4) "Hyperbaric oxygen therapy" or "HBOT" means inhalation of one hundred percent (100%) oxygen in a total
body chamber, where atmospheric pressure is increased and controlled, applicable to the prevention, treatment,
or cure of a disease or condition of human beings;
(5) "Post-traumatic stress disorder" means a mental health condition caused by an extremely stressful or
terrifying event that is diagnosed by a qualified mental health care provider using criteria as set out in the
most recent edition of the American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Disorders;
(6) "Traumatic brain injury" has the same meaning as in KRS 211.470;
(7)[(6)] "Veteran" has the same meaning as in KRS 40.010; and
(8)[(7)] "Written informed consent" means a written document that meets the requirements of KRS 217.936.
Section 2. KRS 217.934 is amended to read as follows:
A veteran shall be an eligible patient for hyperbaric oxygen therapy if he or she has:
(1) A diagnosis of traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder that is attested to by the patient's
treating health care provider;
(2) A prescription for hyperbaric oxygen therapy written by his or her treating health care provider; and
(3) Given written informed consent for the use of HBOT in accordance with KRS 217.936.
Section 3. KRS 217.936 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A veteran or a veteran's legal guardian shall provide written informed consent for treatment with hyperbaric
oxygen therapy in order to receive HBOT to treat traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder.
(2) At a minimum, the written informed consent shall include:
(a) An explanation of the currently approved products and treatments for the traumatic brain injury or post-
traumatic stress disorder from which the veteran suffers;
(b) A description of the potentially best and worst outcomes of using hyperbaric oxygen therapy and a
realistic description of the most likely outcome;
(c) A statement that the veteran's health plan or third-party administrator and provider shall not be
obligated to pay for any care or treatments consequent to the use of hyperbaric oxygen therapy unless
they are specifically required to do so by law or contract; and
(d) A statement that the veteran understands that the patient shall be liable for all expenses related to the
use of hyperbaric oxygen therapy.
(3) The description of potential outcomes required under subsection (2)(b) of this section shall:
(a) Include the possibility that new, unanticipated, different, or worse symptoms may result and that the
proposed treatment may hasten death; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Be based on the treating health care provider's knowledge of the proposed treatment in conjunction with
an awareness of the veteran's condition.
(4) The written informed consent shall be:
(a) Signed by:
1. The veteran; or
2. A legal guardian, if a guardian has been appointed for the veteran; and
(b) Attested to by the veteran's treating health care provider and a witness.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.